Utah statutes.
9-6-205.   Board powers and duties.

(1)  The board may:

(a)  make, amend, or repeal rules for the conduct of its business in governing the council in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act;

(b)  receive gifts, bequests, and property; and

(c)  issue certificates and offer and confer prizes, certificates, and awards for works of art and achievement in the arts.

(2)  The board shall make policy for the council.

(3) (a)  By September 30 of each year, the board shall prepare and submit a request to the governor and the Legislature for prioritized capital facilities grants to be awarded to eligible individuals and organizations under this part and Parts 3 through 5.

(b)  The board shall prepare a list of the requested capital facilities grants in a prioritized order and include a written explanation of:

(i)  the total grant amount requested in the list; and

(ii)  the basis of its prioritization of requested grants on the list.

(c)  The board shall accept applications for capital facilities grants through June 1 of each year, prior to compiling and submitting its yearly request to the governor and the Legislature under Subsection (3)(a).

